Maryland, session 2026, HB1031.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–524.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER” MEANS A MEMBER OF THE
NATIONAL GUARD SUPPORTING OPERATIONS OR MISSIONS IN THE STATE AT THE
REQUEST OF THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES OR THE SECRETARY OF
DEFENSE OF THE UNITED STATES UNDER 32 U.S.C. § 502.
(3) “SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
3–201 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1031*

HOUSE BILL 1031
(B) (1) A NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER MAY NOT USE FORCE AGAINST A
PERSON UNLESS, UNDER THE TOTALITY OF THE CIRCUMSTANCES, THE FORCE IS
NECESSARY AND PROPORTIONAL TO:
(I) PREVENT AN IMMINENT THREAT OF PHYSICAL INJURY TO A
PERSON; OR
(II) EFFECTUATE A LEGITIMATE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OBJECTIVE.
(2) A NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER SHALL CEASE THE USE OF FORCE
AS SOON AS:
(I) THE PERSON ON WHOM THE FORCE IS USED:
1. IS UNDER THE NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER’S
CONTROL; OR
2. NO LONGER POSES AN IMMINENT THREAT OF
PHYSICAL INJURY OR DEATH TO THE NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER OR TO ANOTHER
PERSON; OR
(II) THE NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER DETERMINES THAT FORCE
WILL NO LONGER ACCOMPLISH A LEGITIMATE LAW ENFORCEMENT OBJECTIVE.
(C) A NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER SHALL:
(1) WHEN TIME, CIRCUMSTANCES, AND SAFETY ALLOW, TAKE STEPS
TO GAIN COMPLIANCE AND DE–ESCALATE CONFLICT WITHOUT USING PHYSICAL
FORCE;
(2) INTERVENE TO PREVENT OR TERMINATE THE USE OF FORCE BY
ANOTHER NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER BEYOND WHAT IS AUTHORIZED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION;
(3) RENDER BASIC FIRST AID TO A PERSON INJURED AS A RESULT OF
NATIONAL GUARD ACTION AND PROMPTLY REQUEST APPROPRIATE MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE; AND
(4) FULLY DOCUMENT ALL USE OF FORCE INCIDENTS THAT THE
NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER OBSERVED OR WAS INVOLVED IN.

HOUSE BILL 1031 3
(D) (1) A NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER MAY NOT INTENTIONALLY VIOLATE
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, RESULTING IN SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY OR
DEATH TO A PERSON.
(2) A NATIONAL GUARD MEMBER WHO VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT
TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS.
(3) A SENTENCE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE
SEPARATE FROM AND CONSECUTIVE TO OR CONCURRENT WITH A SENTENCE FOR
ANY CRIME BASED ON THE ACT ESTABLISHING A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.